Wisconsin, session 2025, AB679.
do enact as follows:AB679,11Section 1. 348.25 (8) (b) 4r. of the statutes is created to read:AB679,2,22348.25 (8) (b) 4r. For a permit issued under s. 348.27 (21), $325.AB679,23Section 2. 348.27 (21) of the statutes is created to read:AB679,2,144348.27 (21) Permits for the transportation of grain, feed, or 5commercial fertilizer. (a) Subject to par. (b), the department may issue annual 6or consecutive month permits for the transportation of grain, feed, or commercial 7fertilizer in vehicles or vehicle combinations that have 6 or more axles and that 8exceed the maximum gross weight limitations under s. 348.15 (3) (c). 9Notwithstanding s. 348.15 (8), any axle of a vehicle or vehicle combination that does 10not impose on the highway at least 8 percent of the gross weight of the vehicle or 11vehicle combination may not be counted as an axle for the purposes of this 12paragraph. A permit issued under this subsection does not authorize the operation 13of any vehicle or vehicle combination at a maximum gross weight in excess of 91,000 14pounds.AB679,2,1715(b) Except as provided in par. (c), a permit under this subsection is valid only 16for the transportation of grain, feed, or commercial fertilizer on highways within the 17state trunk highway system and only on a route specified by the department.AB679,3,218(c) If the highways desired to be used by an applicant for a permit under this 19subsection involve highways other than those within the state trunk highway 1system, the application shall be accompanied by a written statement of route 2approval by the officer in charge of maintenance of the other highway.AB679,3,53(d) A permit under this subsection is not valid on any interstate highway 4designated under s. 84.29 (2) except to the extent allowed by federal law without 5any loss or reduction of federal aid or other sanction.AB679,3,76(e) The department may suspend a permit issued under this subsection 7during a spring thaw.AB679,38Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB679,3,109(1) Notwithstanding s. 13.096 (2), the department of transportation may not 10prepare a report on this bill under s. 13.096 (2) and (3).AB679,3,1111